Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Chapter 20

The Victim-Offender Mediation Center

16-20-101. Legislative findings and intent.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

The resolution of felony, misdemeanor and juvenile delinquent disputes can be costly and complex in a judicial setting where the parties involved are necessarily in an adversarial posture and subject to formalized procedures; and

Victim-offender mediation centers can meet the needs of the state's citizens by providing forums in which persons may voluntarily participate in the resolution of disputes in an informal and less adversarial atmosphere.

It is the intent of the general assembly that programs established pursuant to this chapter:

Stimulate the establishment and use of victim-offender mediation centers to help meet the need for alternatives to the courts for the resolution of certain disputes;

Encourage continuing community participation in the development, administration and oversight of local programs designed to facilitate the informal resolution of disputes between and among members of the community;

Offer structures for dispute resolution that may serve as models for centers in other communities; and

Serve a specific community or locale and resolve disputes that arise within that community or locale.

Acts 1993, ch. 420, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Alternative Dispute Resolution in the Personal Injury Forum (William P. Zdancewicz), 26 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1169 (1996).

Mediation U.S.A. (Peter S. Chantilis), 26 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1031 (1996).

Victim-Offender Reconciliation Program — A New Paradigm toward Justice (Susan C. Taylor), 26 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1187 (1996).

Comparative Legislation. Victim-Offender Mediation Act:

Ark. Code § 16-90-701 et seq.

Collateral References. 21 Am. Jur. 2d Criminal Law § 572 et seq.

16-20-102. Operation by a corporation.

A victim-offender mediation center may be created and operated by a corporation organized to resolve disputes. The corporation shall not be organized for profit and no part of the net earnings may inure to the benefit of any private shareholders or individuals. The majority of the directors of the corporation shall not consist of members of any single profession.

To be eligible for funds under this chapter, a center must do the following:

Comply with this chapter and the rules adopted by the supreme court of Tennessee;

Provide neutral mediators who have received training in conflict resolution techniques in accordance with rules of the supreme court;

Provide victim-offender mediation in felony, misdemeanor and juvenile delinquent cases without cost to the participants;

Provide dispute resolution services to the community on a voluntary basis; and

At the conclusion of the mediation process, provide a written agreement or decision to the referral source setting forth the settlement of the issues and future responsibilities of each participant.

Each center that receives funds under this chapter must:

Be operated by a grant recipient;

Be operated in compliance with rules adopted by the supreme court;

Be operated under a contract with the administrative office of the courts (AOC); and

Comply with this chapter.

Funds available for the purposes of this chapter may be allocated for services provided by eligible centers.

A center applying for funding is to include the following information in its application:

The cost of operating the center, including the compensation of employees;

A description of the proposed area of service and number of participants expected to be served;

Proof of nonprofit 501(c)(3) status;

A charter of incorporation; and

Evidence of support of criminal justice agencies to make referrals.

The AOC may accept, apply for and disburse public or private funds for the purposes of this chapter.

The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's authorized representatives may inspect, examine and audit the fiscal affairs of local programs or centers.

Centers must, whenever reasonably possible, make use of public facilities at free or nominal cost.

A center operated under this chapter is not a state agency or an instrumentality of the state. Employees and volunteers of a center are not employees of the state.

A center that receives funds under this chapter must annually provide the AOC with statistical data regarding the following:

The operating budget;

The number of referrals, categories or types of cases referred;

The number of parties serviced;

The number of disputes resolved;

The nature of the resolution, amount and type of restitution to the victim or community, or both; and

Rates of compliance.

The data shall maintain the confidentiality and anonymity of all mediation participants.

Acts 1993, ch. 420, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Section 501(c)(3), referred to in this section, is codified at 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

16-20-103. Confidential and privileged documents and communications.

All memoranda, work notes or products, or case files of centers established under this chapter are confidential and privileged and are not subject to disclosure in any judicial or administrative proceeding unless the court or administrative tribunal determines that the materials were submitted by a participant to the center for the purpose of avoiding discovery of the material in a subsequent proceeding. Any communication relating to the subject matter of the resolution made during the resolution process by any participant, mediator, or any other person is a privileged communication and is not subject to disclosure in any judicial or administrative proceeding unless all parties to the communication waive the privilege.

The privilege and limitation on evidentiary use described in subsection (a) does not apply to any communication of a threat that injury or damage may be inflicted on any person or on the property of a party to the dispute, to the extent the communication may be relevant evidence in a criminal matter. Such communications shall not be construed to be public records pursuant to title 10, chapter 7.

Acts 1993, ch. 420, § 3.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Collateral References.

Waiver of evidentiary privilege by inadvertent disclosure—state law. 51 A.L.R.5th 603.

16-20-104. Withdrawal from dispute resolution.

Any person who voluntarily enters a dispute resolution process at a center established under this chapter may revoke the person's consent, withdraw from dispute resolution and seek judicial or administrative redress prior to reaching a written resolution agreement. No legal penalty, sanction or restraint may be imposed upon the person.

Acts 1993, ch. 420, § 4.

16-20-105. Immunity from suit.

Members of the board of directors of a victim-offender mediation center are immune from suit in any civil action based on any proceedings or other official acts performed in good faith as members of the board.

Employees and volunteers of a center are immune from suit in any civil action based on any proceedings or other official acts performed in their capacity as employees or volunteers, except in cases of willful or wanton misconduct.

A center is immune from suit in any civil action based on any of its proceedings or other official acts performed by its employees, volunteers, or members or its board of directors, except in cases of:

Willful or wanton misconduct by its employees or volunteers; and

Official acts performed in bad faith by members of its board.

Acts 1993, ch. 420, § 5.

16-20-106. Raising and disbursing funds — State funding.

A victim-offender mediation center may raise and disburse funds from any public or private source for the purposes of this chapter.

A center's share of funding from the state shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the approved estimated cost of the program; provided, that during the first three (3) years of operation for any new center, the fifty percent (50%) limitation upon funding from the state shall not apply. In distributing state funds to victim-offender mediation centers, the administrative office of the courts shall consider the need of each center applying for funding.

By a two-thirds (2/3) vote of its legislative body, each county and municipality, as provided in this subdivision (c)(1), is authorized to levy an additional one dollar ($1.00) litigation tax per case, to be denominated as a part of the court costs, in matters before the local general sessions courts and juvenile courts. This subdivision (c)(1) shall only apply in any municipality in any county having a metropolitan form of government and a population of more than one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and in any county having a population according to such census as follows:

not less than nor more than

9,000 9,250

34,735 34,800

51,350 51,450

54,600 55,000

68,100 68,400

Any revenue generated by a county pursuant to subdivision (c)(1) shall be used exclusively to support the local victim-offender mediation center or centers organized pursuant to this chapter and shall be distributed on a monthly basis by the county to such victim-offender mediation center or centers for the purpose of handling victim-offender mediation and other community mediation matters.

By a two-thirds (2/3) vote of its legislative body, each county to which subdivision (c)(1) does not apply is authorized to levy an additional one dollar ($1.00) litigation tax per case, to be denominated as a part of the court costs, in matters before the local general sessions courts and juvenile courts. Any revenue so generated by the county shall be held in a separately designated account until a local victim-offender mediation center is established in the county pursuant to this chapter. Upon the establishment of the victim-offender mediation center, the revenue generated pursuant to this subsection (d) shall be distributed by the county in the manner prescribed by subdivision (c)(2).

The taxes levied by subsections (c) and (d) shall be in addition to any other taxes levied on litigation.

By a two-thirds (2/3) vote of its legislative body, any county having a charter form of government that has a population of less than four hundred thousand (400,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, is authorized to levy an additional litigation tax of one dollar ($1.00) up to a maximum of five dollars ($5.00), to be denominated as a part of the court costs for each petition, warrant and citation, including warrants and citations for traffic offenses, in matters before the local general sessions courts and juvenile courts. The additional one dollar ($1.00) litigation tax may be increased yearly by one dollar ($1.00) until a total litigation tax of five dollars ($5.00) has been levied for such filings.

Any revenue generated by a county pursuant to subdivision (f)(1) shall be used exclusively to support a local victim-offender mediation center or centers organized pursuant to this chapter and shall be distributed on a monthly basis by the county to the victim-offender mediation center or centers for the purpose of handling victim-offender mediation and other community mediation matters.

The taxes levied pursuant to this subsection (f) shall be in addition to any other taxes levied on litigation.

By a two-thirds (2/3) vote of its legislative body, each county to which subdivision (c)(1) or (d) is applicable is authorized to levy an additional one-dollar ($1.00) litigation tax, for a total of two dollars ($2.00) per case, to be denominated as a part of the court costs for each petition, warrant and citation, including warrants and citations for traffic offenses, in matters before the local general sessions courts and juvenile courts.

Any revenue generated by subdivision (g)(1) shall be used by the county for the exclusive purpose of supporting a local victim-offender mediation center or centers organized pursuant to this chapter. Such funds shall be distributed on a monthly basis by the county to the victim-offender mediation center or centers for the purpose of handling victim-offender mediation and other community mediation matters.

The taxes levied pursuant to this subsection (g) shall be in addition to any other taxes levied on litigation.

Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (g) to the contrary, any fees increased by this subsection (g) that are assessed against the state or that otherwise represent a cost to the state shall be limited to the amounts chargeable prior to January 1, 2012.

Acts 1993, ch. 420, § 6; 1999, ch. 533, §§ 1-3; 2008, ch. 800, § 1; 2009, ch. 495, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 254, § 1; 2012, ch. 982, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment deleted “not less than 335,000 nor more than 336,000” from the table in (c)(1); and added (f).

The 2011 amendment added “for the purpose of handling victim-offender mediation and other community mediation matters” at the end of (c)(2).

The 2012 amendment added (g).

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 495, § 3. June 23, 2009.

Acts 2011, ch. 254, § 2. May 23, 2011.

Acts 2012, ch. 982, § 3. May 10, 2012.